Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.008

Trust creation—Methods.

A trust may be created by:

(1) Transfer of property to another person as trustee during the trustor's lifetime or by will or other disposition taking effect upon the trustor's death;

(2) Declaration by the owner of property that the owner holds identifiable property as trustee; or

(3) Exercise of a power of appointment in favor of a trustee.

[ 2011 c 327 s 15.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—2011 c 327: See notes following RCW 11.103.020.